Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Thirty Million Dollars
($30,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to implement
a program in cooperation with Community Development Financial
Institutions which are certified by the United States Small Business
Administration to provide loans to small business entities.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
Req. No. 11769 Page 1

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11769 MAH 01/16/25




















Req. No. 11769 Page 2